Oklahoma, session 2025, HB2322.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law not to be
codified in the Oklahoma Statutes reads as follows:
This act shall be known and may be cited as the "Attorneys and
the State Bar Modernization Act of 2025".
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.

60-1-11844 AQH 12/11/24






Req. No. 11844 Page 1